Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.745

Public corporations—Provision for, control over—Powers.

(1) Any city, town, or county which shall create a public corporation, commission, or authority pursuant to RCW 35.21.730 or 35.21.660, shall provide for its organization and operations and shall control and oversee its operation and funds in order to correct any deficiency and to assure that the purposes of each program undertaken are reasonably accomplished.

(2) Any public corporation, commission, or authority created as provided in RCW 35.21.730 may be empowered to own and sell real and personal property; to contract with a city, town, or county to conduct community renewal activities under chapter 35.81 RCW; to contract with individuals, associations, and corporations, and the state and the United States; to sue and be sued; to loan and borrow funds and issue bonds and other instruments evidencing indebtedness; transfer any funds, real or personal property, property interests, or services; to do anything a natural person may do; and to perform all manner and type of community services. However, the public corporation, commission, or authority shall have no power of eminent domain nor any power to levy taxes or special assessments.

[ 2002 c 218 s 24; 1985 c 332 s 2; 1974 ex.s. c 37 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—Savings—Construction—2002 c 218: See notes following RCW 35.81.005.